Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.08
Seal; adopt; use.

The commission shall adopt a seal, which may be either an engraved or ink stamp seal, with the words State Real Estate Commission, State of Nebraska and such other device as the commission may desire included thereon, by which the acts of the commission shall be authenticated. Copies of all records and papers in the office of the commission, certified by the signature of the director and the seal of the commission, shall be received in evidence in all cases equally and with like effect as the originals.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 8.